District of Columbia statutes.
1-622.01

Federal life insurance benefits.

The life insurance benefits provisions of Chapter 87 of Title 5 of the United States Code shall apply to all employees of the District government first employed before October 1, 1987, except those specifically excluded by law or rule and regulation. Procedures established for administering the life insurance benefits program within the District government shall be consistent with law and civil services rules.

History

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 2201, 25 DCR 5740
Oct. 1, 1987, D.C. Law 7-27, § 2(e), 34 DCR 5079

Section References

This section is referenced in § 1-610.63 and § 1-702.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-623.1.
1973 Ed., § 1-352.1.